Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB707.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 8, 2007 (P.L.90, No.28), known as the Freedom to Breastfeed Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5. Accommodation for breastfeeding in Commonwealth-owned buildings.(a) Requirement generally.--Each Commonwealth-owned building shall contain suitable accommodation in the form of at least one nursing parents room for an employee at the Commonwealth-owned building or a member of the public to breastfeed a child or express breast milk.12345678910111213141516171819 (b) Location.--The location of a nursing parents room in a Commonwealth-owned building shall be determined in consultation with the department based on the operational needs of the offices within the Commonwealth-owned building and the estimated demand for utilization of the nursing parents room by employees and the public.(c) Characteristics.--Each nursing parents room in a Commonwealth-owned building shall:(1) Be in a location that complies with 42 U.S.C. Ch. 126 (relating to equal opportunity for individuals with disabilities). All accessories, equipment, furniture and casework within the nursing parents room shall be provided and installed in compliance with the requirements under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 126, including accessibility clearances and regulations.(2) Have a door that is lockable from the inside.(3) Include a work surface and a chair.(4) Have a minimum of 80 50 net usable square feet. (5) Provide visual and sound privacy to the space.(6) Contain a waste receptacle.(7) Provide at least one conveniently and accessibly placed electrical outlet.(8) Include a small refrigerator for temporarily storing breast milk, where possible.(9) Include storage for cleaning supplies.(10) Include a sink with running water, where possible.(11) Not be a restroom, toilet stall, office, storage room or janitor's closet.(12) Include signage if the nursing parents room is locked or otherwise inaccessible.20250HB0707PN1299 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Signage.--The department shall provide signage in each Commonwealth-owned building showing the location of each nursing parents room within the Commonwealth-owned building.(e) List.--The department shall maintain a list of the location of each nursing parents room in each Commonwealth-owned building on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(f) Guidance or regulations.--The department may issue guidance or promulgate regulations as necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth-owned building." A building subject to the control and supervision of the department in accordance with section 2402(a) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, a capital project administered by an executive agency of the Commonwealth or a capital project that the department delegates to another agency or institution."COMMONWEALTH-OWNED BUILDING." THE STATE CAPITOL, THE GOVERNOR'S RESIDENCE, THE PENNSYLVANIA JUDICIAL CENTER, THE STATE MUSEUM AND ANY BUILDING TITLED TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA IN WHICH THE PUBLIC COMES TO OBTAIN SERVICES FROM THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA."Department." The Department of General Services of the Commonwealth."Nursing parents room." A room for the exclusive use of parents to breastfeed a child or express breast milk.Section 2. This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0707PN1299 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930